Utah statutes.
53B-20-101.   Property of institutions to vest in state board.

The State Board of Regents is the successor to, and vested with, all the powers and authority relating to all properties, real and personal, tangible and intangible, and to the control and management of the property which was held by the governing board of each institution prior to the creation of the board.

